Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-1101
City treasurer or village treasurer; report for fiscal year; publication.

The city treasurer or village treasurer of each city or village that has a population of not more than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census shall prepare and publish annually within sixty days after the close of its municipal fiscal year a statement of the receipts and expenditures of funds of the city or village for the preceding fiscal year. The statement shall also include the information required by subsection (3) of section 16-318 or subsection (2) of section 17-606. Not more than the legal rate provided for in section 33-141 shall be charged and paid for such publication.

Laws 1919, c. 183, § 2, p. 410;

C.S.1922, § 4377;

C.S.1929, § 17-575;

R.S.1943, § 19-1101;

Laws 1959, c. 66, § 1, p. 292;

Laws 1992, LB 415, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB112, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 29;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 99.

City of the first class, receipts and expenditures, publication requirements, see section 16-722.